Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-670
Traffic control device, defined.

Traffic control device shall mean any sign, signal, marking, or other device not inconsistent with the Nebraska Rules of the Road placed or erected by authority of a public body or official having jurisdiction for the purpose of regulating, warning, or guiding traffic.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 166.

A "Road Closed" sign is a traffic control device. State v. Morrissey, 19 Neb. App. 590, 810 N.W.2d 195 (2012).